Indiana, session 2026, HB1182.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-31.5-2-94.5, IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 94.5. "Digital sexual image", for
purposes of IC 35-45-4-9, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-45-4-9.
SECTION 2. IC 35-31.5-2-100, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 204, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 100. (a) "Distribute", for purposes
of IC 35-45-4-8 and IC 35-45-4-9, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-45-4-8.
(b) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-46-1-10, has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-46-1-10(f).
(c) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-46-1-10.2, has the meaning
set forth in IC 35-46-1-10.2(g).
(d) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-47.5, has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-47.5-2-6.
(e) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-48, has the meaning set forth
2026 IN 1182—LS 6700/DI 149


in IC 35-48-1.1-13.
(f) "Distribute", for purposes of IC 35-49, has the meaning set forth
in IC 35-49-1-2.
SECTION 3. IC 35-45-4-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a digital image or video that is distributed:
(A) to report a possible criminal act;
(B) in connection with a criminal investigation;
(C) under a court order; or
(D) by a news reporting or an entertainment medium (as
defined in IC 32-36-1-4);
(2) a newspaper or news service that publishes news related
information through a website;
(3) a cloud service provider; or
(4) an Internet provider, an affiliate or subsidiary of an
Internet provider, or a search engine that:
(A) solely provides access or connection to a website or
other Internet content that is not under the control of that
Internet service provider, affiliate or subsidiary, or search
engine; and
(B) is not responsible for creating or publishing the content
that constitutes material harmful to minors.
(b) As used in this section, "digital sexual image" means a
digital, computer generated image or video that is created or
modified by means of artificial intelligence, a computer software
program, an application, or other editing tools that depicts:
(1) sexual intercourse;
(2) other sexual conduct (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5); or
(3) exhibition of the uncovered buttocks, genitals, or female
breast;
of a quality, characteristic, or condition such that it appears to
depict an individual.
(c) As used in this section, "distribute" has the meaning set forth
in section 8(b) of this chapter.
(d) A person who:
(1) creates; or
(2) possesses;
a digital sexual image without the consent of the individual
depicted in the digital sexual image commits digital sexual image
abuse, a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) An offense under subsection (d) is a:
2026 IN 1182—LS 6700/DI 149


(1) Class A misdemeanor if the person has one (1) prior
unrelated conviction under subsection (d); or
(2) Level 6 felony if the person has more than one (1) prior
unrelated conviction under subsection (d).
(f) A person who distributes a digital sexual image without the
consent of the individual depicted in the digital sexual image
commits distribution of a digital sexual image, a Class A
misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Level 6 felony if the person
has a prior unrelated conviction under this subsection.
2026 IN 1182—LS 6700/DI 149